North Carolina, session 2025, HB628.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-153.10 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
expiration and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.10. Credit for children.
(a) Credit. – A taxpayer who is allowed a federal child tax credit under section 24 of the
Code for the taxable year is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this Part for each
dependent child for whom the taxpayer is allowed the federal credit. A taxpayer is allowed a
credit against the tax imposed by this Part for each qualifying child of the taxpayer. A "qualifying
child" is defined by section 152(c) of the Code. The amount of credit allowed under this section
for the taxable year is equal to the amount listed in the table below based on the taxpayer's
adjusted gross income, as calculated under the Code:
Filing Status AGI Credit Amount
Married, filing jointly Up to $40,000 $125.00$250.00
Over $40,000
Up to $100,000 $100.00$125.00
Over $100,000 0

Head of Household Up to $32,000 $125.00$250.00
Over $32,000
Up to $80,000 $100.00$125.00
Over $80,000 0

Single Up to $20,000 $125.00$250.00
Over $20,000
Up to $50,000 $100.00$125.00
Over $50,000 0

Married, filing separately Up to $20,000 $125.00$250.00
Over $20,000
Up to $50,000 $100.00$125.00
Over $50,000 0.
(b) Limitations. – A nonresident or part-year resident who claims the credit allowed by
this section shall reduce the amount of the credit by multiplying it by the fraction calculated under
*H628-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 105-134.5(b) or (c), as appropriate. The credit allowed under this section may not exceed
the amount of tax imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits
allowed, except payments of tax made by or on behalf of the taxpayer.G.S. 105-153.4. Married
individuals qualifying for a credit under this section who file separate returns may not collectively
claim more than the maximum credit allowed under a joint return.
(c) Credit Refundable. – If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the amount of tax
imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, the Secretary
must refund the excess to the taxpayer. The refundable excess is governed by the provisions
governing a refund of an overpayment by the taxpayer of the tax imposed in this Part. In
computing the amount of tax against which multiple credits are allowed, nonrefundable credits
are subtracted before refundable credits."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2025.
Page 2 House Bill 628-First Edition